Hawaii, session 2026, HB1929.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII: SECTION 1.  The legislature finds that Molokai remains free from many invasive species that are present elsewhere in the State, including but not limited to the coconut rhinoceros beetle, little fire ant, coqui frog, fungi causing rapid ʻōhiʻa death, and miconia.  Preventing the establishment of these invasive species on Molokai is critical to protecting the island's natural environment, agricultural economy, cultural resources, and community well-being. The legislature further finds that in 2025, members of the Molokai community petitioned the department of agriculture and biosecurity to adopt a temporary rule prohibiting the movement of coconut rhinoceros beetle host materials and other high-risk imported goods to Molokai in order to maximize prevention. The legislature also finds that in 2025, the coconut rhinoceros beetle was introduced to Lānaʻi in plants that were previously inspected by the department of agriculture and biosecurity.  Fortunately, because Lānaʻi has a private quarantine facility, facility staff were able to detect and prevent the beetle from being released into the environment, demonstrating that secondary inspection of an interisland transport of plants or plant material upon arrival can support an effective biosecurity system. The legislature additionally finds that Molokai does not have a plant and plant material quarantine or inspection facility and does not have any dedicated inspection staff located on island, potentially leaving Molokai extremely vulnerable to the introduction of invasive species, despite the fact that Molokai is one of the most subsistence-committed islands in the Hawaiian archipelago. The legislature further finds that, as an island state, Hawaii has the opportunity to protect non-invaded islands from invasive species present in other areas of the State and allow them to serve as living repositories for native species and ecosystems being decimated elsewhere. Accordingly, the purpose of this Act is to strengthen biosecurity protections for Molokai by: (1)  Establishing a Molokai biosecurity advisory board; (2)  Requiring the advisory board to advise the department of agriculture and biosecurity in the development of a Molokai biosecurity plan to prevent the spread of invasive species found elsewhere in the State to the island of Molokai; (3)  Authorizing the issuance of general obligation bonds and appropriating funds for a new plant, plant materials, livestock, and other domestic animals quarantine facility on the island of Molokai; and (4)  Appropriating funds. SECTION 2.  (a)  There is established a Molokai biosecurity advisory board within the department of agriculture and biosecurity for administrative purposes.  The advisory board shall consist of seven members who are residents of Molokai; provided that: (1)  The members shall be appointed by the governor as provided in section 26-34, Hawaii Revised Statutes; and (2)  The members shall include: (A)  Homesteaders; (B)  Non-homesteaders; and (C)  Representatives from other organizations and individuals from Molokai's farming community. (b)  The advisory board shall advise the department of agriculture and biosecurity in its development of: (1)  A Molokai biosecurity plan to prevent the spread of invasive species to the island of Molokai that are not currently present on Molokai but are present elsewhere in the State; and (2)  A quarantine facility on Molokai. (c)  The members shall serve without compensation, but shall be reimbursed for expenses, including traveling expenses, necessary for the performance of their duties. SECTION 3.  (a)  With the advice of the Molokai biosecurity advisory board established pursuant to section 2 of this Act, the department of agriculture and biosecurity shall develop a Molokai biosecurity plan to prevent the spread of invasive species to the island of Molokai that are not currently present on Molokai but are present elsewhere in the State, including but not limited to the coconut rhinoceros beetle, little fire ant, coqui frog, fungi causing rapid ʻōhiʻa death, and miconia.  The plan shall, at a minimum: (1)  Address the movement of goods to the island of Molokai, including high-risk commodities and pathways; (2)  Establish inspection, quarantine, and secondary screening processes upon the arrival of plants, plant materials, livestock, and other domestic animals to the island of Molokai; (3)  Establish reporting, detection, and response protocols for suspected invasive species; (4)  Provide policy recommendations to strengthen biosecurity protections for the island of Molokai; and (5)  Prioritize community and interagency engagement. (b)  The department of agriculture and biosecurity shall present the plan to the board of agriculture and biosecurity for review and adoption no later than July 1, 2027. SECTION 4.  The director of finance is authorized to issue general obligation bonds in the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary and the same sum or so much thereof as may be necessary is appropriated for fiscal year 2026-2027 for plans, design, construction, and equipment and appurtenances for a plant, plant materials, livestock, and other domestic animals quarantine and inspection facility on the island of Molokai. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 5.  The appropriation made for the capital improvement project authorized by this Act shall not lapse at the end of the fiscal biennium for which the appropriation is made; provided that all moneys from the appropriation unencumbered as of June 30, 2028, shall lapse as of that date. SECTION 6.  There is appropriated out of the general revenues of the State of Hawaii the sum of $           or so much thereof as may be necessary for fiscal year 2026-2027 to be allocated as follows: (1)  $ for the establishment and operation of the Molokai biosecurity advisory board; (2)  $ for the development of a Molokai biosecurity plan; and (3)  $ for the establishment of full-time equivalent (     FTE) positions to staff the plant, plant materials, livestock, and other domestic animals quarantine and inspection facility and provide other biosecurity support services on the island of Molokai. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. The sum appropriated shall be expended by the department of agriculture and biosecurity for the purposes of this Act. SECTION 7.  This Act shall take effect on July 1, 2050.